Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2086.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 704 of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is repealed:[§ 704. Advisory councils for veterans' homes.(a) Establishment of advisory council.--There is hereby established an advisory council for each veterans' home operated by the Commonwealth to provide stakeholders with a means to advise the Adjutant General on the resident care, management, operations and compliance of facilities and services in veterans' homes to ensure high-quality health care and well-1234567891011121314151617181920 being for residents of veterans' homes. Each advisory council shall consist of 15 members and the Adjutant General or the Adjutant General's designee, who shall serve ex officio. The following shall apply:(1) Ten of the members shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of nominations submitted to the Adjutant General by the Pennsylvania War Veterans' Council. Appointees under this paragraph shall be veterans from the local community of the veterans' home.(2) Three of the members shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of nominations submitted to the Adjutant General by current residents of the veterans' home and shall include a family member of a current or former resident of the veterans' home.(3) The Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President pro tempore of the Senate shall each appoint one member from their respective bodies to serve on each council.(4) The department shall designate a subject matter expert to attend each advisory council's meeting to provide input on the resident care, management, operations and compliance of facilities and services in each veterans' home.(b) Term of office and officers.--(1) Each member of the councils appointed from the General Assembly shall serve for the duration of that General Assembly. Except as provided under paragraph (2), the thirteen members appointed by the Governor shall serve a term of three years.(2) The initial thirteen members selected by the Governor on or after the effective date of this paragraph shall serve as follows: four members for one year, four 20250HB2086PN2682 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 members for two years and five members for three years as designated by the Governor.(3) Each council shall organize as soon as possible and shall annually elect a president, vice president and secretary from the voting members.(c) Removal for cause.--The members appointed by the Governor may be removed by the Governor for cause.(d) Quorum and time of meetings.--Six members of a council shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting the business of the council. Each advisory council shall meet at least quarterly and at other times at the call of the president. Each advisory council shall conduct meetings in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(e) Expenses.--Members of each advisory council shall receive no compensation for their services but shall receive reimbursement for their necessary and proper expenses for attendance at meetings.(f) Power and duty of advisory councils.--Each veterans' home advisory council shall advise the Adjutant General as to the resident care, management, operation and the compliance of facilities and services at their respective homes.(g) Annual reports.--Each advisory council shall submit an annual report to the department that identifies the work of the advisory council, includes an overall assessment of the resident care, management, operations and compliance of facilities and services in each veterans' home and provides recommendations. The department shall submit a consolidated report on the annual reports submitted by each advisory council under this subsection to the Adjutant General and the chair and minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the 20250HB2086PN2682 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives no later than January 30, 2026, and each year thereafter.]Section 2. Section 902 introductory paragraph, (10) and (14) of Title 51 are amended to read:§ 902. General powers and duties of Adjutant General.The Adjutant General as head of the department is responsible to the Commonwealth and to the Governor for the organization and functioning of [said] the department, and the performance and carrying out of all the duties, powers and responsibilities given or delegated. In addition [he] the Adjutant General is hereby authorized and directed to:* * *[(10) Make such bylaws, rules and regulations for the management, general direction and control of the property of the Pennsylvania Soldiers' and Sailors' Home or homes wherever situate.]* * *[(14) Authorize the admittance of any member of a group which has been granted veterans status by the Secretary of Defense and any spouse of a member to State veterans' homes, using admission criteria and procedures as established by the department by regulation.]Section 3. Section 1705 of Title 51 is repealed:[§ 1705. Veterans' home hall of fame.(a) General rule.--Each veterans' home operated by the Commonwealth shall establish and dedicate a hall of fame to recognize and honor the military achievements of outstanding veterans who have completed honorable, active duty military 20250HB2086PN2682 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 service and who reside or resided in the geographic region served by the veterans' home. The area or space in the veterans' home dedicated to the hall of fame may be used for other purposes.(b) Selection of inductees.--The advisory council for each veterans' home shall, consistent with the guidelines established by the commission in subsection (c), nominate eligible veterans for induction into the hall of fame by the commission and perform such other duties relating to the hall of fame as approved by the commission. Any Medal of Honor recipient shall be automatically inducted into the hall of fame.(c) Oversight.--The commission shall develop guidelines for the halls of fame. The guidelines shall include, but not be limited to:(1) Eligibility criteria for qualified candidates.(2) Procedures for nomination of candidates and selection of inductees.(3) Ceremonies to officially honor the inductees.(4) Manner of recognizing or presenting the inductees in the halls of fame.(5) Maintenance of the halls of fame.(6) Duties of the advisory councils of the veterans' homes relating to the halls of fame.(d) Documentation.--Each eligible veteran or his or her representative shall be responsible for obtaining the documentation necessary to establish his or her eligibility from the National Archives in Washington, D.C., or the National Personnel Record Center in St. Louis, Missouri.(e) Centralized list.--The State Veterans' Commission shall keep a centralized list of all hall of fame inductees from all 20250HB2086PN2682 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regional veterans' homes.]Section 4. Title 51 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 20STATE VETERANS' HOMESSec.2001. Definitions.2002. State veterans' homes.2003. State Veterans' Home Board.2004. Admissions.2005. Resident rights.2006. Local advisory councils.2007. State veterans' home hall of fame.§ 2001. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adjutant General." The Adjutant General of the Commonwealth."Admission committee." An admission committee at each State veterans' home responsible for determining whether the home is able to meet the needs of applicants and monitoring the home's waiting list for admission."Board." The State Veterans' Home Board established under section 2003 (relating to State Veterans' Home Board)."Commandant." The administrator of a State veterans' home who is licensed to operate the home in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth."Commission." The State Veterans' Commission."Council." A local advisory council authorized by this chapter.20250HB2086PN2682 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Eligible veteran." An individual who served in the Armed Forces of the United States, including the National Guard or a reserve component, or the Pennsylvania military forces who was discharged or released from service under other than dishonorable conditions and who meets the admissions criteria prescribed by this chapter and established by the board."Nursing care." Care for an individual who is not acutely ill and not in need of hospital or personal care but who requires the services of a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse."Personal care." Shelter, sustenance and incidental medical care to assist an individual who is disabled by age or disease but who is not in need of hospitalization or nursing care services to attain physical, mental and social well-being through special rehabilitative programs."Personal care home." As defined in section 1001 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code."Resident." An individual who is admitted to and resides in a State veterans' home."Resident representative." As defined in 42 CFR 483.5 (relating to definitions)."State veterans' home" or "home." A nursing home or personal care home operated by the board for the provision of nursing care, personal care or other health care services to eligible veterans.§ 2002. State veterans' homes.State veterans' homes shall be established, operated and maintained by the board. The homes shall provide care to eligible veterans and their spouses in compliance with Federal 20250HB2086PN2682 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and State law.§ 2003. State Veterans' Home Board.(a) Establishment.--The State Veterans' Home Board is established within the department for administrative purposes. The board shall exercise its powers and duties independently as an autonomous entity within the department and report to the Governor on matters concerning State veterans' homes.(b) Membership.--The board shall consist of the following members:(1) The Adjutant General or a designee.(2) The Secretary of Health or a designee.(3) The Secretary of Human Services or a designee.(4) Two nursing home administrators who shall be appointed by the Governor.(5) Two licensed health care professionals with clinical experience in nursing homes who shall be appointed by the Governor.(6) Three residents of separate State veterans' homes who shall be appointed by the Governor.(7) One qualified infection preventionist with clinical experience in nursing homes who shall be appointed by the Governor.(c) Terms of office.--(1) Members of the board appointed by the Governor shall serve a term of four years. The initial members appointed under subsection (b)(4), (5), (6) and (7) shall serve as follows:(i) one resident shall serve an initial term of one year;(ii) one nursing home administrator, one licensed 20250HB2086PN2682 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 health care professional with clinical experience in nursing homes and one resident shall serve an initial term of two years;(iii) one nursing home administrator, one licensed health care professional with clinical experience in nursing homes and one resident shall serve an initial term of three years; and(iv) the qualified infection preventionist shall serve an initial term of one year.(2) Upon completion of a term of a member who was appointed under subsection (b)(6), the Governor may not appoint the succeeding member from the same State veterans' home as the previous outgoing member or the sitting resident members of the board.(3) Board members may be removed by the Governor for cause at any time.(d) Officers.--The board shall annually elect a chair and vice chair. The chair may not be a public official appointed by the Governor and subject to consent of the Senate.(e) Vacancies.--Upon the death, resignation, removal or disqualification of a member of the board under subsection (b)(4), (5), (6) or (7), the Governor shall appoint a successor to serve for the unexpired term.(f) Expenses.--Members of the board may not receive compensation for their services but shall be entitled to reimbursement for all necessary travel and other reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.(g) Meetings.--The board shall meet at least twice quarterly and at other times at the call of the chair. The physical or remote presence of five board members shall constitute a quorum. 20250HB2086PN2682 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Action of the board must be approved by a majority vote of the members present at a meeting.(h) Powers and duties.--The board shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Operate State veterans' homes.(2) Ensure that the highest quality of care is provided at State veterans' homes.(3) Promulgate rules and regulations necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including the amendment and rescission of rules and regulations promulgated prior to the effective date of this section by the department or Adjutant General.(4) Appoint for each State veterans' home a commandant who shall be licensed in this Commonwealth as a nursing home administrator. When selecting a commandant, the board shall give preference to veterans.(5) Visit and review the operation of State veterans' homes.(6) Employ and contract with sufficient and qualified staff necessary for the operation of the board and the State veterans' homes, including two infection control nurses at each State veterans' home.(7) Establish requirements for minimum hours of direct care for residents who require nursing care.(8) Accept, on behalf of the Commonwealth, Federal funds and other funding, including gifts, grants and donations, to operate State veterans' homes.(9) Procure insurance against loss in connection with property or other assets under the authority of the board.(10) Obtain information about issues of resident care 20250HB2086PN2682 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 from Department of Health surveys, resident complaints, staff reports and other sources.(11) Determine locations of new State veterans' homes. A location for a new home must be at least 60 miles from an existing home, unless the existing home has maintained at least 85% occupancy over the past three years, in which case the location for the new home must be within 25 miles of the existing home. This paragraph does not apply to new buildings or facilities within existing campuses of homes.(12) Review clinical recordkeeping practices to ensure compliance with Federal and State law.(13) Establish standards for regular staff trainings on fire safety, hazardous materials and chemical storage.(14) Collaborate with commandants to establish permanent, regularly updated crisis management plans at each State veterans' home.(15) Notify the General Assembly and the Governor of problems, including administrative issues, resident safety concerns and issues with staffing.(16) Provide or contract with a third party to provide optional estate planning services to each resident and resident representative.(i) Report.--(1) The board shall biannually submit a report on the operation of State veterans' homes to the Governor, the chair and minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate, the chair and minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives, the chair and minority chair of the Health and Human Services Committee of 20250HB2086PN2682 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include:(i) Information concerning the extent to which each State veterans' home is in compliance with Federal and State law.(ii) Action taken by the board to ensure that each State veterans' home is in compliance with Federal and State law.(iii) The number of resident and staff complaints and the resolution or planned resolution to the complaints.(iv) The number of staff employed at each State veterans' home and the extent to which staffing levels are or are not sufficient.(v) Statistics about the residents of each State veterans' home.(vi) Information about the expenditure of funds.(vii) Information about a new home that is expected to open within the next year.(viii) Recommendations for improvement at each State veterans' home.(ix) Other matters that the board deems pertinent.(2) Information in the report that may identify a particular staff member or resident may not be made publicly available.(3) The board shall post the report on the board's publicly accessible Internet website. The board may redact any information that is subject to paragraph (2).§ 2004. Admissions.20250HB2086PN2682 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Eligibility.--Subject to subsection (b), an individual is eligible for admission to a State veterans' home if the individual meets the following eligibility criteria:(1) The individual must be an eligible veteran, spouse of an eligible veteran or surviving spouse of an eligible veteran.(2) The individual must be a resident of this Commonwealth upon application for admission. An eligible veteran who resides in another state may apply for admission if this Commonwealth was listed as the eligible veteran's home of record upon entry into service.(3) The individual must be approved for admission by the admission committee at the home. The board shall establish a procedure by which a denial of admission may be appealed to the council of the home.(b) Ineligibility.--Notwithstanding subsection (a), the following individuals are ineligible for admission to a State veterans' home:(1) An individual who creates a reasonable threat to the health, safety or welfare of themselves or others.(2) An individual who requires treatment or levels of care that are not available at the home or reasonably available in the immediate vicinity of the home. Unless the requirements for treatment or levels of care exceed what is available at the home or treatment or care options reasonably available within the immediate vicinity of the home, an individual may not be denied admission solely on the basis of a mental health condition.(c) Applications.--The board shall develop an application for admission to a State veterans' home and shall make the 20250HB2086PN2682 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application available at each State veterans' home and on the board's publicly accessible Internet website.(d) Voluntary admissions.--(1) An individual may not be required to accept an offer of admission to a State veterans' home.(2) An individual may not be admitted or readmitted to a home against the will of the individual.(3) An acceptance of an offer of admission may not be conditioned on the surrender of any personal property.§ 2005. Resident rights.(a) Complaints.--(1) A resident of a State veterans' home has the right to access a formal complaint process.(2) The commandant of a State veterans' home shall inform each individual in writing at the time of admission to the State veterans' home of the individual's right to complain to the commandant or the board about care, accommodations, services and other matters.(3) A resident may make complaints or recommend changes to policies to staff, the commandant, the board and to other individuals free from coercion, discrimination and retaliation.(b) Privacy.--(1) A resident has a right to a presumption of privacy of the resident's persons and property against unreasonable intrusion, searches and seizures.(2) A resident and the resident's representative shall be informed in writing of the reasons necessitating a search of the resident's room or property by staff of the State veterans' home and may be present during the search if the 20250HB2086PN2682 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 resident or resident's representative requests to be present.(3) If staff of the State veterans' home takes a resident's property or other item, the State veterans' home shall provide to the resident and the resident's representative a written receipt describing the property or items taken.(4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict staff of the State veterans' home from entering a resident's room to provide care, maintenance, housekeeping or other services.(5) Unauthorized searches or seizures of resident property by a member of the staff may be grounds for dismissal of the member.(c) Transfers and discharges.--(1) A State veterans' home shall inform a resident and the resident's representative in writing of a transfer or discharge of a resident and the reasons for the transfer or discharge.(2) Except where the health or safety of a resident in the State veterans' home would be endangered or an urgent transfer or discharge is required because of the resident's medical needs, notice of transfer or discharge shall be provided at least 30 days before the planned transfer or discharge.(3) The board may establish additional standards for transfers and discharges of residents.(d) Property of discharged residents.--(1) At discharge of a resident, the commandant shall hold any unclaimed property of the resident for 12 months. During that time period, the commandant shall promptly give 20250HB2086PN2682 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 notice to the resident and the resident's representative about the unclaimed property.(2) If the resident or the resident's representative has not claimed the unclaimed property at the expiration of 12 months after the discharge of the resident, the unclaimed property shall be deemed to be the property of the State veterans' home and shall be subject to the home's control and disposal and not subject to Article XIII.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.(e) Property of deceased residents.--(1) At death of a resident, the commandant shall hold any unclaimed property of the resident for 12 months. During that time period, the commandant shall promptly give notice to the resident's representative or next of kin about the unclaimed property.(2) If no resident representative or next of kin has claimed the unclaimed property at the expiration of 12 months after death of the resident, the unclaimed property shall be deemed to be the property of the State veterans' home and shall be subject to the home's control and disposal and not subject to Article XIII.1 of The Fiscal Code.§ 2006. Local advisory councils.(a) Establishment of advisory council.--An advisory council shall be established for each State veterans' home to provide stakeholders with a means to advise the Adjutant General on the resident care management, operations and compliance of facilities and services in State veterans' homes to ensure high-quality health care and well-being for residents of State veterans' homes.(b) Membership.--Each advisory council shall consist of the 20250HB2086PN2682 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 members provided under this subsection and the Adjutant General or the Adjutant General's designee, who shall serve ex officio. The following shall apply:(1) Ten of the members shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of nominations submitted to the Adjutant General by the Pennsylvania War Veterans' Council. Appointees under this paragraph shall be veterans from the local community of the State veterans' home.(2) Three of the members shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of nominations submitted to the Adjutant General by current residents of the State veterans' home and shall include a family member of a current or former resident of the State veterans' home.(3) The Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President pro tempore of the Senate shall each appoint one member from their respective bodies to serve on each advisory council.(4) The department shall designate a subject matter expert to attend each advisory council's meeting to provide input on the resident care, management, operations and compliance of facilities and services in each State veterans' home.(c) Term of office and officers.--(1) Each member of an advisory council appointed from the General Assembly shall serve for the duration of that General Assembly. Except as provided under paragraph (2), the members appointed by the Governor shall serve a term of three years.(2) The initial 13 members appointed by the Governor shall serve as follows, as designated by the Governor:20250HB2086PN2682 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Four members for one year.(ii) Four members for two years.(iii) Five members for three years.(3) Each advisory council shall organize as soon as possible and shall annually elect a president, vice president and secretary from the voting members.(d) Removal for cause.--The members appointed by the Governor may be removed by the Governor for cause.(e) Quorum and time of meetings.--(1) Six members of an advisory council shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting the business of the advisory council.(2) Each advisory council shall meet at least quarterly and at other times at the call of the president.(3) Each advisory council shall conduct meetings in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(f) Expenses.--Members of an advisory council may not receive compensation for their services but shall receive reimbursement for their necessary and proper expenses for attendance at meetings.(g) Powers and duties of advisory councils.--Each advisory council shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Advise the Adjutant General as to the resident care, management, operation and compliance of facilities and services at their respective State veterans' homes.(2) Advise the commandant and the board regarding quality of care and resident and staff safety concerns at the State veterans' home.(3) Nominate qualifying veterans for induction to the veterans' hall of fame maintained at the State veterans' home 20250HB2086PN2682 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consistent with guidelines established by the commission and perform other duties relating to the hall of fame.(h) Annual reports.--Each advisory council shall submit an annual report to the department that identifies the work of the advisory council, includes an overall assessment of the resident care, management, operations and compliance of facilities and services in each State veterans' home and provides recommendations. The department shall submit a consolidated report on the annual reports submitted by each advisory council under this subsection to the Adjutant General and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives no later than January 30, 2026, and each year thereafter.§ 2007. State veterans' home hall of fame.(a) Duty to establish and maintain.--Each State veterans' home shall establish, dedicate and maintain a hall of fame to recognize and honor the military achievements of outstanding veterans who reside or resided in the geographic region served by the State veterans' home. The area or space in the State veterans' home dedicated to the hall of fame may be used for other purposes.(b) Selection of inductees.--The council shall, consistent with the guidelines established by the commission under subsection (c), nominate qualifying veterans for induction into the hall of fame by the commission and perform other duties relating to the hall of fame as approved by the commission. A Medal of Honor recipient shall be automatically inducted into the hall of fame.20250HB2086PN2682 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Oversight.--The commission shall develop guidelines for the hall of fame. The guidelines shall include:(1) Eligibility criteria for a qualifying veteran.(2) The procedure for nomination of a qualifying veteran and selection of an inductee.(3) The ceremony to officially honor an inductee.(4) The manner of recognizing or presenting an inductee in the hall of fame.(5) Maintenance of the hall of fame.(6) The duties of a council relating to the hall of fame.(d) Documentation.--A qualifying veteran or a representative of a qualifying veteran must obtain and submit the documentation necessary to establish the qualifying veteran's eligibility from the National Archives in Washington, DC, or the National Personnel Record Center in St. Louis, Missouri.(e) Centralized list.--The commission shall keep a centralized list of all hall of fame inductees from all State veterans' homes.Section 5. Any and all regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB2086PN2682 - 20 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122